test/src/morphology/N-aandaji_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āndaji*: # Noun 186 'eng /est andja/fin' - full paradigm
     āndaji*+N+Sg+Nom: āndaji*
     āndaji*+N+Sg+Gen: āndajiz
     āndaji*+N+Sg+Par: āndajizt
     āndaji*+N+Sg+Dat: āndajizõn
     āndaji*+N+Sg+Ins: āndajizõks
     āndaji*+N+Sg+Ill: āndajizõ
     āndaji*+N+Sg+Ela: āndajizõst
     āndaji*+N+Pl+Nom: āndajid
     āndaji*+N+Pl+Gen: āndajid
     āndaji*+N+Pl+Par: āndajidi
     āndaji*+N+Pl+Dat: āndajidõn
     āndaji*+N+Pl+Ins: āndajidõks
     āndaji*+N+Pl+Ill: āndajiž
     āndaji*+N+Pl+Ela: āndajisti
